Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 6

Capital Outlay Notes

9-21-601. Authorization for the issuance of capital outlay notes.

The governing body of a local government acting by resolution is hereby authorized to issue and sell interest-bearing capital outlay notes for all purposes for which bonds can be legally authorized and issued by a local government for public works projects as defined in this chapter and for property valuation, tax assessment and tax equalization programs. The sale of all interest-bearing capital outlay notes shall first be approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 6-1; 2010, ch. 868, § 52.

9-21-602. Purchase price and terms of capital outlay notes — Interest rate agreements.

Capital outlay notes shall be sold for not less than ninety-nine percent (99%) of the par value thereof and accrued interest as the governing body of the local government may direct. Capital outlay notes may be sold in one (1) or more series, may bear such date or dates, may bear interest at such rate or rates (which may vary from time to time), may be payable at such time or times, may be in such denomination or denominations, may be in such form, either coupon or registered, may be payable at such place or places, may be executed in such manner, may be payable in such medium of payment, may be subject to such terms of redemption, without a premium or, for notes sold for not less than the par value thereof and accrued interest, without or with a premium of not exceeding one percent (1%) of the principal amount thereof, all as may be provided by resolution of the governing body of the local government.

The term of capital outlay notes issued pursuant to this part and parts 1 and 4 of this chapter shall not exceed the reasonably expected economic life of the project being financed as stated in the resolution authorizing the capital outlay notes. An erroneous estimate of the reasonably expected economic life of the project shall in no way affect the validity of such notes.

With respect to all or any portion of any issue of capital outlay notes issued or anticipated to be issued hereunder, at any time during the term of the capital outlay notes, and upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that the contracts and agreements authorized herein are in compliance with the guidelines, rules or regulations adopted or promulgated by the state funding board, as set forth in § 9-21-130, a local government by resolution may authorize and enter into interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, and other interest rate hedging agreements under such terms and conditions as the governing body of the local government may determine, including, without limitation, provisions permitting the local government to pay to or receive from any person or entity any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination thereof or default under such agreement.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 6-2; 1999, ch. 432, § 6; 2001, ch. 253, § 9.

9-21-603. Security for capital outlay notes.

When the capital outlay notes are issued and sold, they shall be direct obligations of the local government, the payments of which shall be made according to the tenor and effect thereof, to which shall be pledged the taxing power of the local government as to all taxable property in the local government. The governing body is hereby authorized to levy and provide for the collection of a special tax over and above all other taxes authorized or limited by law to be imposed and levied on all the taxable property in the local government to create a sinking fund to retire such notes with interest as they fall due. Capital outlay notes issued for an income producing public works project may be additionally secured by and payable from revenues of such public works project.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 6-3.

9-21-604. Three-year capital outlay notes subject to periodic renewals.

Capital outlay notes issued pursuant to this section may be issued for a period not to exceed the end of the third fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the notes were issued; provided, that, with the approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, the maturity date of such notes may be extended or renewed for not more than two (2) additional periods not exceeding three (3) years each. Each fiscal year that any such original or such extension or renewal notes are outstanding following the fiscal year in which notes are issued, the local government shall retire a portion thereof equal to not less than one-ninth (1/9) of the original principal amount of the notes. The resolution authorizing any such issue of notes shall provide for the principal of the notes to be payable annually, either by maturity or by mandatory redemption. The resolution authorizing such notes may provide that the notes shall be subject to redemption prior to maturity at the option of the local government. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, in approving any such notes, may waive the requirement of periodic retirement.

Capital outlay notes issued from funds derived from the sale of any Tennessee private act hospital may be issued for a period not to exceed the end of the twentieth fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the notes were issued, with the approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. Each fiscal year that any such notes are outstanding following the fiscal year in which notes are issued, the local government shall retire a portion thereof equal to not less than one-twentieth (1/20) of the original principal amount of the notes. The resolution authorizing any such issue of notes shall provide for the principal of the notes to be payable annually, either by maturity or by mandatory redemption. The resolution authorizing such notes may provide that the notes shall be subject to redemption prior to maturity at the option of the local government. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, in approving any such notes, may waive the requirement of periodic retirement.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 6-4; 1987, ch. 77, § 8; 1993, ch. 514, §§ 3, 4; 1994, ch. 806, § 4; 2005, ch. 393, § 4; 2010, ch. 868, § 53; 2016, ch. 832, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1993, ch. 514, § 11 provided that it is the legislative intent that the amendment by that act be prospective only, and apply to all bonds and notes issued or all contracts entered into after July 1, 1993, and that any initial resolution already published but not finalized be subject to the requirements of the law as it existed prior to that date.

9-21-605. Capital outlay notes issued solely for the acquisition of a fee simple absolute interest in land.

Capital outlay notes issued solely for the acquisition of a fee simple absolute interest in land pursuant to this section may be issued for a period not to exceed the end of the tenth fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the notes were issued. Each fiscal year any notes are outstanding following the fiscal year in which the notes are issued, the local government shall retire principal on the notes in an amount that is estimated to be at least equal to an amortization that will reflect level debt service of the note issue as established at the time of sale, or as otherwise approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee; provided, that all such notes shall be retired in no event greater than the end of the tenth fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the notes were issued. The resolution authorizing any such issue of notes shall provide for the principal of the notes to be payable annually, either by maturity or by mandatory redemption. The resolution authorizing such notes may provide that the notes shall be subject to redemption prior to maturity at the option of the local government.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 6-5; 1987, ch. 77, § 9; 2005, ch. 393, § 5; 2010, ch. 868, § 54.

9-21-606. Application for extension or renewal of three-year capital outlay notes and capital outlay notes issued for the acquisition of land — Retirement of notes.

Application to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for an extension or renewal of the maturity date of capital outlay notes issued under §§ 9-21-604 and 9-21-605 shall be by resolution of the governing body of the local government.

No capital outlay notes shall be converted to bonds later than two (2) years following the date of original issuance of such notes without the approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee; provided, that at or prior to the maturity date or extended maturity date of the capital outlay notes, any such notes then outstanding shall be retired from funds of the local government or be converted to bonds under chapter 11 of this title, or any other law, or be otherwise liquidated as approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 6-6; 2010, ch. 868, § 55.

9-21-607. Method of sale of three-year capital outlay notes and seven-year capital outlay notes.

Notes authorized to be issued under §§9-21-604 and9-21-605 may be sold in such manner either at a competitive public sale or at a private negotiated sale as the governing body of the local government may direct.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 6-7.

9-21-608. Twelve-year capital outlay notes.

Capital outlay notes issued pursuant to this section may be issued for a period greater than the end of the third fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the notes were issued, but not greater than the end of the twelfth fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the notes were issued. Each fiscal year any such notes are outstanding following the fiscal year in which the notes were issued, the local government shall retire principal on the notes in an amount that is estimated to be at least equal to an amortization that will reflect level debt service of the note issue, as established at the time of the sale and as indicated in the resolution authorizing the notes, or as otherwise approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee; provided, that all such notes shall be retired in no event greater than the twelfth fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the notes were issued. The resolutions authorizing any such issue of notes shall provide for principal of the notes to be payable annually, either by maturity or by mandatory redemption. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, in approving any such notes, may waive the requirement of periodic retirement. The resolution authorizing such issue of notes may provide that the notes shall be subject to redemption prior to maturity at the option of the local government. Notes issued pursuant to this section totaling two million dollars ($2,000,000) or less shall be sold at competitive public sale or by the informal bid process described in §9-21-609. Notes issued pursuant to this section totaling greater than two million dollars ($2,000,000) shall be sold at competitive sale.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 6-8; 1987, ch. 77, § 10; 1993, ch. 514, § 5; 2005, ch. 393, § 6; 2010, ch. 868, § 56.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1993, ch. 514, § 11 provided that it is the legislative intent that the amendment by that act be prospective only, and apply to all bonds and notes issued or all contracts entered into after July 1, 1993, and that any initial resolution already published but not finalized be subject to the requirements of the law as it existed prior to that date.

9-21-609. Method of sale of twelve-year capital outlay notes.

Capital outlay notes authorized under § 9-21-608 may be sold either at a competitive public sale or by an informal bid process in which, whenever possible, at least three (3) financial institutions are contacted by telephone or letter and asked to provide a rate or rates of interest for the term or terms of such notes. If the informal bid process is used, the local government shall comply with the provisions outlined in subsection (c).

If the capital outlay notes will be sold at competitive public sale, then the local government shall publish a notice of sale at least five (5) days prior to the date on which the capital outlay notes are to be sold, either in a financial newspaper having national circulation, or via an electronic communication system that is generally available to the financial community. The notice of sale shall set forth the time, date and place of sale, the maximum amount of capital outlay notes to be sold, the maximum interest rate, the maximum discount, if any that will be permitted, in dollars or as a percentage of par value, and the basis upon which the capital outlay notes will be awarded. If the principal amount of capital outlay notes to be sold is not greater than five million dollars ($5,000,000), then the notice of sale may be published either as set forth in this subsection (b), or solely in a newspaper having general circulation in the local government.

If the capital outlay notes will be sold through the informal bid process described in subsection (a), then the local government shall first submit to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for approval a copy of the proposed resolution authorizing the notes, a copy of the proposed disclosure statement, if any, a statement showing the estimated annual principal and interest requirements for the notes, and a detailed statement showing the estimated cost of issuance which shall include at least the following, if applicable:

Fiscal agent and/or financial advisor fees;

Bond counsel fees;

Other legal charges, if any;

Credit enhancement fees;

Trustee fees;

Registration fees;

Paying agent fees;

Rating agency fees;

Underwriters' discount or charges;

Remarketing agent fees;

Printing, advertising and other expenses; and

The number of financial institutions contacted and if only one (1) institution was contacted, a statement as to why only one (1) institution was contacted;

together with any other information deemed pertinent to the note issue by the local government.

Based upon the information submitted and any additional information deemed pertinent by the local government, the local government shall state and demonstrate in its request for approval to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee that the proposed sale is feasible, that the proposed sale is in the best interests of the local government, and that the local government should be able to amortize the proposed indebtedness, together with all other obligations then outstanding. The state funding board may establish guidelines to assist the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee in reviewing applications so submitted by the local government. The guidelines, if any, will be made available to the local government upon request to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall notify the governing body of the local government of the comptroller of the treasury's or the comptroller's designee's approval or disapproval within ten (10) days from the date that all required information is received by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. If the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee approves a sale for the capital outlay notes or if the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee fails to act within such time, then the local government may proceed to sell the notes in that manner. If the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee does not approve the proposed negotiated sale, then the local government may proceed to sell the notes at a competitive public sale in the manner provided by subsection (b).

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 6-9; 1993, ch. 514, §§ 6-8, 10; 2005, ch. 393, § 7; 2010, ch. 868, § 57.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1993, ch. 514, § 11 provided that it is the legislative intent that the amendment by that act be prospective only, and apply to all bonds and notes issued or all contracts entered into after July 1, 1993, and that any initial resolution already published but not finalized be subject to the requirements of the law as it existed prior to that date.

9-21-610. Application for extension or renewal of capital outlay notes issued for greater than three (3) years but not greater than twelve (12) years — Renewal of notes.

Application to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for an extension or renewal of the maturity date of capital outlay notes described in § 9-21-608 shall be by resolution of the governing body of the local government, and such extension or renewal shall not extend the final maturity date of the notes beyond the end of the twelfth fiscal year following the first fiscal year in which the notes were issued. If the requested extension is for a period greater than three (3) years, then the local government must comply with § 9-21-609(b) and (c) prior to the issuance of the renewal or extension notes.

No capital outlay notes shall be converted to bonds later than two (2) years following the date of original issuance of such notes without the approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee; provided, that at or prior to the maturity date or extended maturity date of the capital outlay notes, any such notes then outstanding shall be retired from funds of the local government or be converted to bonds under chapter 11 of this title, or any other law, or be otherwise liquidated as approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Acts 1986, ch. 770, § 6-10; 2005, ch. 393, § 8; 2010, ch. 868, § 58.

9-21-611. Capital outlay notes issued solely to the environmental protection agency.

Capital outlay notes issued solely to the environmental protection agency of the United States (EPA) under the Asbestos in School Hazard Abatement Program (20 U.S.C. § 4011 et seq.) may be issued for a period not to exceed twenty (20) years from the date of issue. The resolution authorizing any such issue of notes shall provide for the notes to mature serially and may provide that the notes shall be subject to redemption prior to maturity at the option of local government. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee in approving any such notes may waive the requirement of periodic retirement.

All capital outlay notes issued prior to June 8, 1989, and all proceedings theretofore taken to authorize the issuance of such notes by any local government to the EPA for the asbestos in school hazard abatement program of the EPA are hereby ratified, validated and confirmed, and such notes are hereby declared to be valid and legally binding obligations payable in accordance with their terms, notwithstanding any lack of power of the governing body of the local government to authorize or issue such notes and to provide for the payment thereof in the manner stated in such notes and in the proceedings authorizing their issuance, and notwithstanding any defects or irregularities in any such proceedings or the failure of any such proceedings authorizing any such notes to comply with this chapter or any applicable general or special law.

Acts 1989, ch. 542, §§ 2, 3; 2010, ch. 868, § 59.

9-21-612. Refunding of capital outlay notes.

Capital outlay notes issued pursuant to this part and general obligation bonds may be refunded by issuing capital outlay notes under this part, in accordance with the requirements and procedures set forth in this part and in §§9-21-903,9-21-904,9-21-910,9-21-912,9-21-913 and9-21-914. The final maturity date of the refunding notes shall not be later than the final maturity date of the notes being refunded or the bonds being refunded, unless otherwise approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Acts 1994, ch. 806, § 5; T.C.A., §9-21-917; Acts 1996, ch. 632, § 1; 2005, ch. 393, § 9; 2010, ch. 868, § 60.